src/phonology/rus-phon.twolc
!! ==> twolc_header <==
!! This file is produced automatically from the script make_twolc_files.sh
!! DO NOT EDIT THIS FILE DIRECTLY!! Instead, edit the component file(s) in the 
!! rules/ directory and then run `sh make_twolc.sh`.


!! ==> 000 <==
!! ============================================================================
Alphabet
      %>     ! End of nominal stem
      %<     ! End of verbal stem
      %^F:0  ! placed immediately before fleeting vowels Fа Fе Fо Fи Fя Fа́ Fе́ Fё Fо́ Fи́ Fя́
      %^o:о %^O:о́ ! verbal prefix fleeting vowels
      %^G:0  ! Facilitates GenPl ов/ев when it "should" be zero or ей (its presence blocks the transformation rule)
      %^Z:0  ! "Zero ending" resolves to 0/ь/й (used for short-form adj's)
      %^M:0  ! Verb stem mutation
      %^D:д  ! Archiphoneme for realizing the д~жд verbal alternation (as opposed to д~ж)
      %^T:т  ! Archiphoneme for realizing the т~щ verbal alternation (as opposed to т~ч)
      %^d:д  ! Archiphoneme for verb stems with -дший past active participles (-сти 7 (-д-) )
      %^t:т  ! Archiphoneme for verb stems with -тший past active participles (-сти 7 (-т-) )
      %^R:р  ! Archiphoneme for бороть and пороть
      %^U:ь %^U:й %^U:и   ! Imperative ending (unstressed)
      %^S:й %^S:и́ %^S:0   ! Imperative ending (stressed)
      %^P:0 ! п in prefix по for comparatives
      %^A:0 ! о in prefix по for comparatives
      %^Y:ы́ ! ы́ in verbal prefix вы́- (Triggers rules for forming the imperative with %^U and %^S)

      »7     ! »
      «7     ! «
      %[%>%]
      %[%<%] ! angle brackets (this is to avoid the internal use of < and >)

      %%
      %  ! space
      %-

      ¹ ² ³ ⁴ ⁵ ⁶ ⁷ ⁸ ⁹ ⁰ ! Used to enumerate homonymous lemmas

      № 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 %0 ! numerals in compounds like 10-летие

      P S ! as in, PS

      А Б В Г Д Е Ё Ж З И Й К Л М Н О П Р С Т У Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Щ Ъ Ы Ь Э Ю Я
      А́         Е́ Ё́     И́           О́         У́               Ы́   Э́ Ю́ Я́
      А̀         Ѐ Ё̀     Ѝ           О̀         У̀               Ы̀   Э̀ Ю̀ Я̀
      а б в г д е ё ж з и й к л м н о п р с т у ф х ц ч ш щ ъ ы ь э ю я
      а́         е́ ё́     и́           о́         у́               ы́   э́ ю́ я́   ! ё́ is not currently used, since = ё
      а̀         ѐ ё̀     ѝ           о̀         у̀               ы̀   э̀ ю̀ я̀ ;

Sets

Letter = А Б В Г Д Е Ё Ж З И Й К Л М Н О П Р С Т У Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Щ Ъ Ы Ь Э Ю Я
         А́         Е́ Ё́     И́           О́         У́               Ы́   Э́ Ю́ Я́
         А̀         Ѐ Ё̀     Ѝ           О̀         У̀               Ы̀   Э̀ Ю̀ Я̀
         а б в г д е ё ж з и й к л м н о п р с т у ф х ц ч ш щ ъ ы ь э ю я
         а́         е́ ё́     и́           о́         у́               ы́   э́ ю́ я́
         а̀         ѐ ё̀     ѝ           о̀         у̀               ы̀   э̀ ю̀ я̀
         %- %  № 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 %0 ;
! Consonants
C = Б В Г Д Ж З Й К Л М Н П Р С Т Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Щ
    б в г д ж з й к л м н п р с т ф х ц ч ш щ ;
! Consonants, excluding { Д д Т т }
CNoDT = Б В Г Ж З Й К Л М Н П Р С Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Щ
        б в г ж з й к л м н п р с ф х ц ч ш щ ;
! Unvoiced consonants
UnvoicedC = К П С Т Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Щ
            к п с т ф х ц ч ш щ ;
! Hushers
HUSH = Ж Ш Щ Ч
       ж ш щ ч ;
! Velars
VEL = Г К Х
      г к х ;
! Paired consonants (consonants that have both a hard and soft variant, excluding Velars)
PC = Б В Д З Л М Н П Р С Т Ф
     б в д з л м н п р с т ф ;
! Paired consonants, excluding { Н н }
PCNoN = Б В Д З Л М П Р С Т Ф
        б в д з л м п р с т ф ;
! Vowels
V = А Е Ё И О У Ы Э Ю Я
    А́ Е́ Ё́ И́ О́ У́ Ы́ Э́ Ю́ Я́
    А̀ Ѐ Ё̀ Ѝ О̀ У̀ Ы̀ Э̀ Ю̀ Я̀
    а е ё и о у ы э ю я
    а́ е́ ё́ и́ о́ у́ ы́ э́ ю́ я́
    а̀ ѐ ё̀ ѝ о̀ у̀ ы̀ э̀ ю̀ я̀ ;
! Stressed vowels
StressedV = А́ Е́ Ё́ Ё И́ О́ У́ Ы́ Э́ Ю́ Я́
            а́ е́ ё́ ё и́ о́ у́ ы́ э́ ю́ я́ ;
! Unstressed vowels
UnstressedV = А Е И О У Ы Э Ю Я
              а е и о у ы э ю я ;

Definitions

End = [ а́:0 | о́:0 | а:0 | о:0 | я́:0 | ё:0 | е́:0 | я:0 | е:0 | ь:0 | й:0 ] ;
VELEndV = :VEL [ а́:0 | о́:0 | а:0 | о:0 ] %>: ;     ! тоска́, молоко́, кни́га, я́блоко
VELEndC = :VEL %>: ;                               ! уче́бник
VELEnd = [ VELEndV | VELEndC ] ;
HUSHEndV = :HUSH [ а́:0 | о́:0 | а:0 | е:0 ] %>: ;   ! моча́, плечо́, пи́ща, чудо́вище
HUSHEndC = :HUSH ( ь:0 ) %>: ;                     ! мяч, вещь
HUSHEnd = [ HUSHEndV | HUSHEndC ] ;
цEndV = :ц [ а́:0 | о́:0 | а:0 | е:0 ] %>: ;         ! рысца́, мясцо́, учи́тельница, се́рдце
цEndC = :ц %>: ;                                   ! молоде́ц
цEnd = [ цEndV | цEndC ] ;
SCEndV = :PC [ е́:0 | е:0 | ё:0 | я́:0 | я:0 ] %>: ; ! мо́ре, земля́, неде́ля
SCEndVNoN = :PCNoN [ е́:0 | е:0 | ё:0 | я́:0 | я:0 ] %>: ;
! SCEndVNoNcleanup = \%^F:0 ? :н [ е́:0 | е:0 | ё:0 | я́:0 | я:0 ] %>: ;
! SCEndVNoN = [ SCEndVNoNmostly | SCEndVNoNcleanup ] ;
FVn0 = %^F:0 V: :н [ ь:0 | я:0 ] %>: ; ! GenPl of e.g. башня and MscShortForm of e.g. столетний
SCEndC = :PC ь:0 %>: ;                                 ! конь
SCEnd = [ SCEndV | SCEndC ] ;
HCEndV = :PC [ а́:0 | о́:0 | а:0 | о:0 ] %>: ;           ! красота́, окно́, ве́ра, сло́во
HCEndC = :PC %>: ;                                     ! пол
HCEnd = [ HCEndV | HCEndC ] ;
VEndV = V: [ я́:0 | ё:0 | е́:0 | я:0 | е:0 ] %>: ;       ! судия́, остриё, житие́, Мари́я, поня́тие
VEndC = \%^F:0 V: й:0 %>: ;                            ! музе́й
VEnd = [ VEndV | VEndC ] ;
JEndV = C: %^F:0 V: й: [ я́:0 | ё:0 | я:0 | е:0 ] %>: ; ! семья́, бельё, колдунья, счастье
JEndC = C: %^F:0 V: й: %>: ;                           ! мураве́й
JEnd = [ JEndV | JEndC ] ;
jEndV = \%^F:0 V: (%^F:0 V:) й:й [ я́:0 | ё:0 | я:0 | е:0 ] %>: ; ! вайя
jEndC = \%^F:0 V: (%^F:0 V:) й:й й:0 %>: ;                       ! Гавайи (lexical form = Гавайй)
jEnd = [ jEndV | jEndC ] ;
1ConjV = V %<: ;                      ! читать, умолять, белеть, воевать, etc.?
1ConjJ = (%^F:0 V:) :ь %<: ;          ! бить, бей, бью
VerbHUSH = :HUSH (%^M:0) %<: ;        ! слышу (ю)
VyPrefix = ( [ п о | п е р е | с а м о ] ) в %^Y:ы́  ;

Rules
!! 01_base_rules.twolc
!! 02_stem_palatalization.twolc
!! 03_spellingrule-husher.twolc
!! 04_spellingrule-velar.twolc
!! 05_spellingrule-c.twolc
!! 06_fleeting-vowel-deletion.twolc
!! 07_fleeting-vowel-insertion.twolc
!! 08_nouns_ie-ii.twolc
!! 09_stress.twolc
!! Genitive plural of nouns
!! Comparative adjectives
!! Masculine short-form adjectives
!! Stem alternations
!! Vowels in nonpast endings
!! Imperatives
!! Verbal prefix fleeting vowels and voicing assimilation

! If one wants to test specific two-level rules one can add test pairs to the
! twolc files. Support for this type of testing has only recently been added, and
! works only for the Xerox tools (because the pair-testing facilities in Hfst use
! a different format, and converting from one to the other is non-trivial without
! knowledge of the alphabet).

! The test data looks like the following: (€ for positive, $ for negative)

!!€ рабо́та>у
!!€ рабо́т0>у
!!$ рабо́та>у
!!$ рабо́та>0

!! ==> 001 <==
!! ============================================================================
"Remove extra stress marks on stem: the stress mark closest to the end remains"
Vx:Vy <=> [ .#. | \[ %^F:0 | %>: | %<: ] ] _ [ :StressedV | [ \[ %>: ] $[ :StressedV ] ] ] ;
where Vx in ( а́ э́ о́ у́ ы́ я́ е́ ё ю́ и́ )
      Vy in ( а э о у ы я е е ю и )
    matched ;
!!€ сло́во>а́
!!€ слов0>а́
!!€ у́мн>а́
!!€ умн>а́
!!€ сёст^Fёра́>ы
!!€ сёст00р0>ы
!!€ се́м^Fе́йя́>у́
!!€ сем00ь0>ю́
!!€ прочи́та́<ем
!!€ прочита́<ем

!! ==> 002 <==
!! ============================================================================
"V>0: Delete lexical vowel endings (o/о́ and е are covered in other rules), and delete most fleeting vowels with syllabic endings"
Vx:0 <=> .#. ( %^P: %^A: ) [ Letter: | %^F:0 | %>: ]+ _ %>: ;
!!€ Тама́ра>а
!!€ Тама́р0>а
!!€ мо́ре>о
!!€ мо́р0>е
!!€ Петр>овна>а
!!€ Петр>овн0>а
         %^F:0 _ [ Letter ]+ (End) %>: :V ; ! This does not delete люб(о)вью, since the ь is 1st
!!€ о́к^Fоно>о́
!!€ ок00н0>о́
!!€ зе́м^Fе́ля́>е́
!!€ зем00л0>е́
         %^F:0 _ й: %<: :V ;
!!€ б^Fе́й<у́
!!€ б00ь<ю́
!!€ б^Fе́й<^Sте
!!€ б0е́й<0те
         %^F:0 _ ( :C ) %<: :л :V ( :с :ь ) .#. ;
!!€ ж^Fёг<ла́
!!€ ж00г<ла́
         %^F:0 _ ( :C ) %<: :V ;
! TODO examples to test for this rule
where Vx in ( а е́ ё и я а́ и́ я́ ) ;

!! ==> 003 <==
!! ============================================================================
"е>0: 1) Delete lexical vowel endings; 2) Delete fleeting vowels where ending begins with a vowel; 3) Delete е after comparative adjective stem mutation."
е:0 <=> .#. ( %^P: %^A: ) [ Letter: | %^F:0 ]+ _ %>: ;
            ! see examples in parallel rule of "V>0" above
         %^F:0 _ [ Letter ]+ (End) %>: :V ;
            ! see examples in parallel rule of "V>0" above
         [ г: | к: | х: ] %>: [ е | е́: ] _ ( %^P: ).#. ; ! After comparative adjective mutation
!!€ ли́х>е́е
!!€ ли́ш>е0
         %^F:0 _ ( :C ) %<: :л :V ( :с :ь ) .#. ;
         %^F:0 _ ( :C ) %<: :V ;

!! ==> 004 <==
!! ============================================================================
"[оо́]>0 in lexical endings, fleeting vowels (including verbal prefixes), and zero GenPl"
[ о:0 | о́:0 ] <=> .#. ( %^P: %^A: ) [ Letter: | %^F:0 ]+ _  %>: ; ! lexical ending
                    ! see examples in parallel rule of "V>0" above
                  %^F:0 _ [ Letter ]+ (End) %>: :V ; ! fleeting vowel
                    ! see examples in parallel rule of "V>0" above
!!€ люб^Fо́вь>ы́
!!€ люб00в0>и́
!!€ люб^Fо́вь>ью
!!€ люб0о́в0>ью
                  [ VELEndV | HUSHEndV | цEndV | HCEndV | FVn0 | JEndV | jEndV ] _ в:0 .#. ; ! zero GenPl
!!€ кни́га>ов
!!€ кни́г0>00
!!€ чудо́вище>ов
!!€ чудо́вищ0>00
!!€ пти́ца>ов
!!€ пти́ц0>00
!!€ пи́ла́>о́в
!!€ пи́л0>00
!!€ ба́ш^Fеня>ов
!!€ ба́ш0ен0>00
!!€ се́м^Fе́йя́>ов
!!€ сем0е́й0>00
!!€ ва́йя>ов
!!€ ва́й0>00
                  %^F:0 _ ( :C ) %<: :л :V ( :с :ь ) .#. ;
                  %^F:0 _ ( :C ) %<: :V ;

!! ==> 005 <==
!! ============================================================================
"[oO]>0 Delete verbal prefix fleeting vowels"
[ %^o:0 | %^O:0 ] <=> [ в | н а д | н а́: д | о б | о́: б | о т | о́: т | п о д | п о́: д | п р е д | п р е́: д | с | в з: | в о з: | в о́: з: | и з: | и́: з: | н и з: | н и́: з: | р а з: | р а́: з: ] _ :C (%^F:0) :V ;
!!€ с^Oго́н^M<ю́
!!€ с0гон0<ю́

!! ==> 006 <==
!! ============================================================================
"O>о Destress verbal prefix fleeting vowel, if there is stress to the right"
%^O:о <=> [ в | н а д | н а́: д | о б | о́: б | о т | о́: т | п о д | п о́: д | п р е д | п р е́: д | с | в з: | в о з: | в о́: з: | и з: | и́: з: | н и з: | н и́: з: | р а з: | р а́: з: ] _ [ [ ?* :StressedV ?* ] - [ :C (%^F:0) :V ?* ] ] .#. ;

!! ==> 007 <==
!! ============================================================================
"з>с in some verbal prefixes with dropped fleeting vowels, when the following consonant is unvoiced"
з:с <=> [ в | в о | в о́: | и | и́: | н и | н и́: | р а | р а́: ] _ [ %^o:0 | %^O:0 ] :UnvoicedC (%^F:0) :V ;
!!€ раз^oш^Fе́й<у́
!!€ разош00ь<ю́
!!€ раз^oши́л
!!€ рас0ши́л

!! ==> 008 <==
!! ============================================================================
"ь>0 in lexical endings, and before fleeting vowels"
ь:0 <=> .#. ( %^P: %^A: ) [ Letter: | %^F:0 ]+ _  %>: ;
!!€ ко́сть>ь
!!€ ко́ст0>ь
!!€ ми́лость>ы
!!€ ми́лост0>и
        .#. ( %^P: %^A: ) Letter+ _ %^F:0 V ;
!!€ во́сь^Fемь>ь
!!€ во́с00ем0>ь
